Vermont statutes. Title 11B Nonprofit Corporations
Subchapter 3. Voting Agreements

§ 7.30.
Voting agreements.

Two or more members may provide for the manner in which they will vote by signing an agreement for that purpose. Such agreements may be valid for a period of up to 10 years. For public benefit corporations, such agreements must have a reasonable purpose not inconsistent with the corporation’s public or charitable purposes.

A voting agreement created under this section is specifically enforceable.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.